California statutes. Vehicle Code
(10) A motor vehicle with a currently valid identification or registration permit issued by another state, if the other state recognizes an identification plate or device issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) as valid for use in that state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

38012.

(a) As used in this division, “off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification” means a motor vehicle subject to subdivision (a) of Section 38010.

(b) As used in this division, “off-highway motor vehicle” includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) A motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, except for any motorcycle that is eligible for a special transportation identification device issued pursuant to Section 38088.

(2) A snowmobile or other vehicle designed to travel over snow or ice, as defined in Section 557.

(3) A motor vehicle commonly referred to as a sand buggy,
 dune buggy, or all-terrain vehicle.

(4) A motor vehicle commonly referred to as a jeep.

(5) A recreational off-highway vehicle as defined in Section 500.

(6) An off-highway electric motorcycle as defined in Section 436.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 588, Sec. 3.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

38013.

Unless otherwise provided, the terms “identification” and “identification certificate” shall have the same meaning as the terms “registration” and “registration card,” respectively, as used in Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38014.

As used in this division, “closed course” includes, but is not limited to, a speedway, racetrack, or a prescribed and defined route of travel on or off a highway that is closed to all motor vehicles other than those of participants. A closed course is one which is not available at any time for vehicular access by the general public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1050.)
-------------------------------------------

38020.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, a person shall not operate or leave standing an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification under this code that is not registered under the provisions of Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000), unless it is identified under the provisions of this chapter. A violation of this section is an infraction. Riding in violation of seasons established by Section 2412(f) and 2415 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations constitutes a violation of this section. This section shall not apply to the operation, transportation, or leaving standing of an off-highway vehicle pursuant to a valid special permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 345, Sec. 18.   (AB 2752)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

38021.

(a) A manufacturer, dealer, or distributor, or his agent, owning or lawfully possessing any off-highway motor vehicle of a type otherwise required to be identified hereunder may operate or use such vehicle without an identification certificate and plate or device upon condition that each such vehicle is accompanied by a special permit issued to the manufacturer, dealer, or distributor as provided in this division.

(b) Persons licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 11700) of Chapter 4 of Division 5 need not obtain such a permit provided the vehicle is operated or used
 under special plates issued to the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38022.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 4000, motorcycles issued a special transportation identification device pursuant to Section 38088 may be transported upon a highway to and from a closed course.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1050.)
-------------------------------------------

38025.

In accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 4000, a motor vehicle issued a plate or device pursuant to Section 38160 may be operated or driven upon a highway but only as follows:

(a) On a two-lane highway, only to cross the highway at an angle of approximately 90 degrees to the direction of the roadway and at a place where a quick and safe crossing may be made, or only when the roadway is not maintained by snow removal equipment and is closed to motor vehicles that are subject to registration
 pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000), or only to cross a highway in the manner specified in subdivision (b).

(b) With respect to the crossing of a highway having more than two lanes, or a highway having limited access, a motor vehicle may cross a highway but only at a place designated by the Department of Transportation or local authorities with respect to a highway under their respective jurisdictions as a place where a motor vehicle, or specified types of motor vehicle, may cross a highway, and a vehicle shall cross the highway only at that designated place and only in a quick and safe manner.

(c) The Department of Transportation and local authorities with respect to a highway under their respective jurisdictions may designate, by the erection of an appropriate sign of a type approved by the Department of Transportation, a place where a motor vehicle, or
 specified type of motor vehicle, may cross a highway having more than two lanes or having limited access.

(d) A motor vehicle identified pursuant to Section 38010 may be towed upon a highway, but not driven, if the vehicle displays a plate or device issued pursuant to Section 38160.

(e) A motorcycle identified pursuant to Section 38010 may be pushed upon a highway, but not ridden, if the motorcycle has displayed upon it a plate or device issued pursuant to Section 38160.

(f) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, may operate or drive an off-highway vehicle identified pursuant to Section 38010 upon a highway in an emergency response situation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

38026.

(a) In addition to Section 38025 and after complying with subdivision (c) of this section, if a local authority, an agency of the federal government, or the Director of Parks and Recreation finds that a highway, or a portion of a highway, under the jurisdiction of the authority, agency, or the director, as the case may be, is located in a manner that provides a connecting link between off-highway motor vehicle trail segments, between an off-highway motor vehicle recreational use area and necessary service facilities, or between lodging facilities and an off-highway motor vehicle recreational facility and if it is found that the highway is designed and constructed so as to safely permit the use of regular vehicular traffic and also the driving of off-highway motor vehicles on that highway, the local authority, by resolution or
 ordinance, agency of the federal government, or the Director of Parks and Recreation, as the case may be, may designate that highway, or a portion of a highway, for combined use and shall prescribe rules and regulations therefor. A highway, or portion of a highway, shall not be so designated for a distance of more than three miles, except as provided in Sections 38026.1, 38026.2, and 38026.3. A freeway shall not be designated under this section.

(b) The Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation Commission may propose highway segments for consideration by local authorities, an agency of the federal government, or the Director of Parks and Recreation for combined use.

(c) Prior
 to designating a highway or portion of a highway on the motion of the local authority, an agency of the federal government, or the Director of Parks and Recreation, or as a recommendation of the Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation Commission, a local authority, an agency of the federal government, or the Director of Parks and Recreation shall notify the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, and shall not designate any segment pursuant to subdivision (a) which, in the opinion of the commissioner, would create a potential traffic safety hazard.

(d) (1) A designation of a highway, or a portion of a highway, under subdivision (a) shall become effective upon the erection of appropriate signs of a type approved by the Department of Transportation on and along the highway, or portion of the highway.

(2) The cost of the signs shall be reimbursed from the
 Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund, when appropriated by the Legislature, or by expenditure of funds from a grant or cooperative agreement made pursuant to Section 5090.50 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 592, Sec. 1.   (SB 632)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38026.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), the City of Needles may establish a pilot project to designate combined-use highways on roads in the city for no more than 10 miles so that the combined-use highways can be used to link existing off-highway motor vehicle trails and trailheads on federal Bureau of Land Management or United States Forest Service lands, and to link off-highway motor vehicle recreational-use areas with necessary service and lodging facilities, in order to provide a unified system of trails for off-highway motor vehicles, preserve traffic safety, improve natural resource protection, reduce off-highway vehicle trespass on private land, and minimize impacts on city residents.

(b) A pilot project established pursuant to this
 section shall do all of the following:

(1) Prescribe a procedure for highway, road, or route selection and designation. The procedure shall be approved by a vote of a majority of the city council.

(2) Prescribe a procedure for the city to remove a combined-use designation, including a designation that is removed as a result of the conclusion of the pilot program.

(3) In cooperation with the Department of Transportation, establish uniform specifications and symbols for signs, markers, and traffic control devices to control off-highway motor vehicles, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Devices to warn of dangerous conditions, obstacles, or hazards.

(B) Designations of
 the right-of-way for regular vehicular traffic and off-highway motor vehicles.

(C) A description of the nature and destination of the off-highway motor vehicle trail.

(D) Warning signs for pedestrians and motorists of the presence of off-highway motor vehicle traffic.

(4) Require that off-highway motor vehicles subject to the pilot project meet the safety requirements of federal and state law regarding proper drivers’ licensing, helmet usage, and the requirements specified in Section 38026.5.

(5) Prohibit off-highway motor vehicles from traveling faster than 35 miles per hour on highways designated under this section.

(6) (A)   Prohibit a combined-use highway road segment designated under
 this section from exceeding 10 miles.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), two or more combined-use highway road segments may share a common starting point or ending point and may partially overlap as long as the resulting network of the highway road segments does not include more than three distinct locations of shared starting or ending points, or both.

(7) Include an opportunity for public comment at a public hearing held by the city in order to evaluate the pilot project.

(c) A pilot project established pursuant to this section may include use of a state highway, subject to the approval of the Department of Transportation, or any crossing of a highway designated pursuant to Section 38025.

(d) (1)   By selecting and designating a highway for
 combined use pursuant to this section, the city agrees to defend and indemnify the state against any and all claims, including legal defense and liability arising from a claim, for any safety-related losses or injuries arising or resulting from use by off-highway motor vehicles of a highway designated as a combined-use highway by the city council pursuant to this section.

(2) This subdivision does not alter the requirements of subdivision (e).

(e) The city shall not designate a highway for combined use pursuant to this section unless the Commissioner of the Department of the California Highway Patrol finds that designating the highway for combined use would not create a potential traffic safety hazard.

(f) (1)   Not later than January 1, 2027, the City of Needles, in consultation with the Department of the California
 Highway Patrol, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Parks and Recreation, shall prepare and submit to the Legislature a report evaluating the pilot project, and containing all of the following:

(A) A description of the road segments designated to allow combined use for over three miles, as approved or adopted by a majority vote of the members of the City of Needles city council.

(B) An evaluation of the overall safety and effectiveness of the pilot project, including its impact on traffic flows, safety, off-highway vehicle usage on existing trails, incursions into areas not designated for off-highway vehicle usage, and nonmotorized recreation.

(C) A description of the public comments received at a public hearing held by the city in regards to an evaluation of the pilot project.

(2) On or before January 1, 2027, the City of Needles, in consultation with the entities listed in paragraph (1), shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature that includes the information specified in paragraph (1).

(g) On or before January 1, 2027, the City of Needles, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Mojave Desert Air Quality Management District, shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature on the operation and impacts of the combined-use highways designated pursuant to this section, and the portions of any adjoining trails in close proximity to those highways, including impacts to neighboring lands affected by the system, if any. The report shall include the latest available information, including, but not limited to, impacts on cultural resources and archaeological sites, streambed modifications and water quality impacts, impacts
 on protections for wildlife and aquatic habitat, native plants, and wildlife, traffic, particulate pollution, and noise.

(h) (1) The reports submitted pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 185, Sec. 4.   (AB 2152)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

38026.3.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the Department of Parks and Recreation may establish a pilot project to designate combined-use highways on roads in Red Rock Canyon State Park for no more than 10 miles so that the combined-use highways can be used to link existing off-highway motor vehicle trails and trailheads on federal Bureau of Land Management or United States Forest Service lands, and to link off-highway motor vehicle recreational-use areas with necessary service and lodging facilities, in order to provide a unified system of trails for off-highway motor vehicles, preserve traffic safety, improve natural resource protection, and reduce off-highway vehicle trespass on private land.

(b) A pilot project established pursuant to
 this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Prescribe a procedure for highway, road, or route selection and designation. The procedure shall be approved by the director of the department.

(2) Prescribe a procedure for the department to remove a combined-use designation, including a designation that is removed as a result of the conclusion of the pilot project.

(3) In cooperation with the Department of Transportation, establish uniform specifications and symbols for signs, markers, and traffic control devices to control off-highway motor vehicles, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Devices to warn of dangerous conditions, obstacles, or hazards.

(B) Designations of
 the right-of-way for regular vehicular traffic and off-highway motor vehicles.

(C) A description of the nature and destination of the off-highway motor vehicle trail.

(D) Warning signs for pedestrians and motorists of the presence of off-highway motor vehicle traffic.

(4) Require that off-highway motor vehicles subject to the pilot project meet the safety requirements of federal and state law regarding proper drivers’ licensing, helmet usage, and the requirements specified in Section 38026.5.

(5) Prohibit off-highway motor vehicles from traveling faster than 35 miles per hour on highways designated under this section.

(6) (A) Prohibit a combined-use highway road
 segment designated under this section from exceeding 10 miles.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), two or more combined-use highway road segments may share a common starting point or ending point and may partially overlap as long as the resulting network of the highway road segments does not include more than three distinct locations of shared starting or ending points, or both.

(7) Include an opportunity for public comment at a public hearing held by the department in order to evaluate the pilot project.

(c) A pilot project established pursuant to this section may include use of a state highway, subject to the approval of the Department of Transportation, or any crossing of a highway designated pursuant to Section 38025.

(d) The department shall not
 designate a highway for combined use pursuant to this section unless the Commissioner of the Department of the California Highway Patrol finds that designating the highway for combined use would not create a potential traffic safety hazard.

(e) (1) Not later than January 1, 2029, the department, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the Department of Transportation, shall prepare and submit to the Legislature a report evaluating the pilot project that contains all of the following:

(A) A description of the road segments designated to allow combined use for over three miles.

(B) An evaluation of the overall safety and effectiveness of the pilot project, including its impact on traffic flows, safety, off-highway vehicle usage on existing trails, incursions into
 areas not designated for off-highway vehicle usage, and nonmotorized recreation.

(C) A description of the public comments received at a public hearing held by the department in regards to an evaluation of the pilot project.

(2) The report required by this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 592, Sec. 2.   (SB 632)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

38026.5.

(a) In accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 4000, a motor vehicle issued a plate or device pursuant to Section 38160 may be operated or driven on a local highway, or a portion of the local highway, that is designated pursuant to Section 38026, 38026.1, 38026.2, or 38026.3 if the operation is in conformance with this code and the vehicle complies with off-highway vehicle equipment requirements specified in this division.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), it is unlawful for a person using an off-highway vehicle on a combined-use highway to do any of the
 following:

(1) Operate an off-highway motor vehicle on the highway during the hours of darkness.

(2) Operate a vehicle on the highway that does not have an operational stoplight.

(3) Operate a vehicle on the highway that does not have rubber tires.

(4) Operate a vehicle without a valid driver’s license of the appropriate class for the vehicle operation in possession.

(5) Operate a vehicle on the highway without complying with Article 2 (commencing with Section 16020) of Chapter 1 of Division 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 592, Sec. 3.   (SB 632)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38027.

Motor-driven cycles issued a plate or device pursuant to Section 38160 may be moved, by nonmechanical means only, adjacent to a roadway, in such a manner so as to not interfere with traffic upon the highway, only for the purpose of gaining access to, or returning from, areas designed for the operation of off-highway vehicles, when no other route is available. The Department of Transportation or local authority may designate access routes leading to off-highway parks as suitable for the operation of off-highway vehicles, if such access routes are available to the general public only for pedestrian and off-highway motor vehicle travel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38030.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 38020, an unidentified off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification may be left standing upon a highway or public or private property adjacent to the place of business of a dealer of such motor vehicles when done so in connection with the loading and unloading or storage of such vehicles to be used in the dealer’s business, unless already prohibited by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Original Identification [38040. - 38060.]

38040.

Application for the original identification of a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, required to be identified pursuant to this division shall be made by the owner to the department upon the appropriate form furnished by it and shall contain all of the following:

(a) The true, full name, business or residence and mailing address, and the driver’s license or identification card number, if any, of the owner and the legal owner, if any.

(b) The name of the county in which the owner resides.

(c)A description of the vehicle, including the following, insofar as it may exist:

(1) The make, model, and type of body.

(2) The vehicle identification number or any other number as may be required by the department.

(d) Information as may reasonably be required by the department to enable it to determine whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to identification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1221, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

38041.

Application for the original identification of a motorcycle shall be made by the owner to the department upon the appropriate form furnished by it, and shall contain:

(a) The true, full name, business or residence and mailing address, and the driver’s license or identification card number, if any, of the owner and the legal owner, if any.

(b) The name of the county in which the owner resides.

(c) A description of the motorcycle including the following data insofar as it may exist:

(1) The make and type of body.

(2) The motor and frame numbers recorded exactly as stamped on the engine and frame, respectively, by the manufacturer, and any other identifying number of the motorcycle as may be required by the department.

(3) The date first sold by a manufacturer or dealer to a consumer.

(d) Such information as may reasonably be required by the department to enable it to determine whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to identification.

(e) The department shall maintain a cross-index file of motor and frame numbers
 identified with it.

The application shall be accompanied by a tracing, tape lift, or photograph of the motor or frame numbers, or where the facsimile of the motor or frame numbers cannot be obtained, a verification of the numbers shall be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1221, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

38045.

Ownership of title to an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification under this division may be held by two (or more) coowners as provided in Section 682 of the Civil Code, except that:

(a) A vehicle may be identified in the names of two (or more) persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or.” A vehicle so identified in the alternative shall be deemed to be held in joint tenancy. Each coowner shall be deemed to have granted to the other coowners the absolute right to dispose of the title and interest in the vehicle. Upon the death of a coowner, the interest of the decedent shall
 pass to the survivor as though title or interest in the vehicle was held in joint tenancy, unless a contrary intention is set forth in writing upon the application for identification.

(b) A vehicle may be identified in the names of two (or more) persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or” and if declared in writing upon the application for identification by the applicants to be community property, or tenancy in common, shall grant to each coowner the absolute power to transfer the title or interest of the other coowners only during the lifetime of such coowners.

(c) A vehicle may be identified in the names of two (or more) persons as coowners in the conjunctive by the use of the word “and” and shall thereafter require the signature of each coowner or his personal representative to transfer title to the vehicle, except where title to the vehicle is set forth
 in joint tenancy, the signature of each coowner or his personal representative shall be required only during the lifetime of the coowners, and upon death of a coowner title shall pass to the surviving coowner.

(d) The department may adopt suitable abbreviations to appear upon the certificate of identification and certificate of ownership to designate the manner in which title to the vehicle is held if set forth by the coowners upon the application for identification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38050.

In the absence of the regularly required supporting evidence of ownership upon application for identification or transfer of a vehicle, the department may accept an undertaking or bond which shall be conditioned to protect the department and all officers and employees thereof and any subsequent purchaser of the vehicle, any person acquiring a lien or security interest thereon, or the successor in interest of such purchaser or person against any loss or damage on account of any defect in or undisclosed claim upon the right, title, and interest of the applicant or other person in and to the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38055.

In the event the vehicle is no longer identified in this state and the currently valid certificate of ownership is surrendered to the department, the bond or undertaking shall be returned and surrendered at the end of three years or prior thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 402.)
-------------------------------------------

38060.

(a) Whenever any person, after making application for identification of an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification, or after the identification either as owner or legal owner, moves or acquires a new address different from the address shown in the application or upon the certificate of ownership or identification certificate, that person shall, within 10 days thereafter, notify the department of his or her old and new addresses.

(b) Any owner having notified the department as required in subdivision (a), shall immediately mark out the former on the face
 of the certificate and write with pen and ink or type the new on the face of the certificate immediately below the former address and initial the entry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 118.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Evidences of Identification [38070. - 38100.]

38070.

The department, upon identifying an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification, shall issue a certificate of ownership to the legal owner and an identification certificate to the owner, or both to the owner if there is no legal owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38075.

(a) The identification certificate shall contain upon the face thereof the date issued, the name and residence or business or mailing address of the owner and of the legal owner, if any, the identification number to the vehicle, and a description of the vehicle as complete as that required in the application for the identification of a vehicle.

(b) The director may modify the form, arrangement, and information appearing on the face of the identification certificate and may provide for standardization and abbreviation of fictitious or firm names thereon whenever he
 finds that the efficiency of the department will be promoted thereby, except that general delivery or post office box numbers shall not be permitted as the address of the identified owner unless there is no other address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1213, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

38076.

The certificate of ownership shall contain:

(a) Not less than the information required upon the face of the identification certificate.

(b) Provision for notice to the department of a transfer of the title or interest of the owner or legal owner.

(c) Provision for application for transfer of identification by the transferee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38080.

(a) The department may authorize, under Section 4456, dealers licensed under Article 1 (commencing with Section 11700) of Chapter 4 of Division 5 to use the process described in Section 4456 and corresponding temporary identification devices upon off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification that they sell.

(b) Off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification that are purchased from dealers not required to be licensed under Article 1 (commencing with Section 11700) of Chapter 4 of Division 5, or that are specially constructed by the owner or owners, may be operated off-highway, as provided by this division, without an identification
 plate or device or identification certificate, provided a receipt or other suitable device issued by the department is displayed upon the vehicle evidencing an application has been made and appropriate fees paid pursuant to this division, until the identification plate or device and identification certificate are received from the department.

(c) This section shall become operative January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 26.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

38085.

(a) Every owner upon receipt of an identification certificate shall maintain the same or a facsimile copy thereof with the vehicle for which it is issued at all times when the vehicle is operated or transported.

(b) The provisions of this section do not apply when an identification certificate is removed from the vehicle for the purpose of application for renewal or transfer of identification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

38087.

(a) Upon payment of the fees specified in Section 38231, the department may issue to manufacturers, dealers, distributors, or their agents, a special permit to operate or use for the purpose of delivery, demonstration, or display, off-highway motor vehicles otherwise required to be identified under this division.

(b) Special permits issued pursuant to this section shall expire at midnight on the 30th day of June in the second calendar year following the year of issuance of such permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38087.5.

(a) Upon payment of the fee specified in Section 38231.5, the Department of Parks and Recreation may issue to a nonresident of this state a special permit to operate an off-highway motor vehicle otherwise required to be identified under this chapter.

(b) Special permits issued under this section shall expire on December 31 in the year of their issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38087.7.

(a) Upon payment of the fee specified in Section 38231.7, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall issue an annual special permit, to be known as the “sanctioned event permit,” to California residents to operate an off-road motorcycle at a sanctioned event. The sanctioned event permit shall be available for online purchase beginning January 1, 2026.

(b) A sanctioned event permit shall expire on December 31 of the year that the permit is issued.

(c) A sanctioned event permit shall only be available to California residents and for model year 2022 and newer off-road motorcycles that are not eligible for the “Green Sticker” or “Red Sticker” off-highway vehicle identification issued by the department.

(d) A sanctioned event permit shall be displayed on the left side of an off-road motorcycle and shall be visible for inspection at sanctioned events. A sanctioned event permit shall be nonrefundable, nonreplaceable, and void if removed from an off-road motorcycle.

(e) For purposes of this section, “sanctioned event” means an event approved by an agency within its guidelines for off-highway vehicle competition or racing events.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 446, Sec. 1.   (SB 708)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38088.

(a) Upon payment of the fee specified in Section 38232, the department shall issue to the owner of a motorcycle, which the owner has certified as being used exclusively in racing events on a closed course, a special transportation identification device for the purpose of identifying the motorcycle while it is being transported upon a highway to and from racing events on a closed course. Such device may be either a plate or a sticker, whichever is determined by the department to be the most appropriate.

(b) Such device is nonrenewable, nontransferrable, and becomes invalid when the vehicle
 for which it was issued is sold or dismantled.

(c) A certificate of ownership may not be issued in conjunction with a special transportation identification device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1050.)
-------------------------------------------

38090.

If any identification certificate or identification plate or device is stolen, lost, mutilated or illegible, the owner of the vehicle for which the same was issued, as shown by the records of the department, shall immediately make application for and may, upon furnishing information satisfactory to the department, obtain a duplicate or substitute or a new identification under a new number, as determined to be most advisable by the department. An application for a duplicate identification certificate is not required in conjunction with any other application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

38095.

If any certificate of ownership is stolen, lost, mutilated or illegible, the legal owner or, if none, the owner of the vehicle for which the same was issued as shown by the records of the department shall immediately make application for and may, upon furnishing information satisfactory to the department, obtain a duplicate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38100.

The provisions of Sections 4458, 4460, 4461, 4462, 4463, and 4464 shall be fully applicable to motor vehicles identified under this division and the terms “identification” and “identification certificate” shall have the same meaning as the terms “registration” and “registration card,” respectively, as used in those sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Renewal of Identification [38110. - 38135.]

38110.

Certificates of ownership shall not be renewed but shall remain valid until suspended, revoked, or canceled by the department for cause or upon transfer of any interest shown therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38115.

Every motor vehicle identification and identification certificate issued pursuant to this division shall expire at midnight on the 30th day of June in the second calendar year following the year of issuance of such certificate. The department may upon payment of the proper fees renew such identification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38120.

(a) Application for renewal of identification of off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification shall be made by the owner not later than midnight of the 30th day of June of the expiration year. The application shall contain the true, full name and driver’s license or identification card number, if any, of the owner.

(b) Whenever any application for identification or transfer of ownership of an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification is filed with the
 department between June 1 and June 30 of the year of expiration, the application shall be accompanied by the full renewal fees in addition to any other fees then due and payable.

(c) Whenever an application for identification or transfer of ownership of an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification is filed with the department between January 1 and May 31 of the year of expiration, the application may be accompanied by full renewal fees in addition to any other fees then due and payable, which renewal fees shall be for the two-year period following June 30th of the year in which paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1221, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

38121.

(a) Prior to the expiration of the identification of an off-highway motor vehicle, if that identification is not to be renewed prior to its expiration, the owner of the vehicle shall file, under penalty of perjury, a certification that the vehicle will not be operated, used, or transported on public property or private property in a manner so as to subject the vehicle to identification during the subsequent identification period without first making an application for identification of the vehicle, including full payment of all fees. The
 certification of nonoperation is valid until the identification is renewed under subdivision (c).

(b) Each certification of nonoperation filed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by a filing fee of fifteen dollars ($15).
